ukrainian/test.aff
SFX s Y 252
SFX s у ах .
SFX s ові е .
SFX s е о .
SFX s ться лась .
SFX s ою 0 .
SFX s а ости .
SFX s го сти .
SFX s ими ости .
SFX s ло тися .
SFX s ь име .
SFX s вши лись .
SFX s ймо вавши .
SFX s сти ю .
SFX s ості ий .
SFX s ємо вала .
SFX s й вали .
SFX s имемо ь .
SFX s ися ь .
SFX s істю а .
SFX s вали ють .
SFX s ймося єтеся .
SFX s в нням .
SFX s вати єм .
SFX s лося тимусь .
SFX s єм ймося .
SFX s ємося юсь .
SFX s лася тимуть .
SFX s йтеся вавшись .
SFX s мемося ся .
SFX s тимешся лися .
SFX s єтеся вавшися .
SFX s нні ти .
SFX s уся е .
SFX s имемся ься .
SFX s вся тимем .
SFX s ємся валась .
SFX s єш юсь .
SFX s єшся ють .
SFX s йся ватись .
SFX s юся вались .
SFX s ючи вало .
SFX s мем сь .
SFX s имеш ься .
SFX s нню вшись .
SFX s нням тимешся .
SFX s є ватись .
SFX s ння вся .
SFX s им ням .
SFX s ім ням .
SFX s ної ти .
SFX s них в .
SFX s ами нім .
SFX s ам ній .
SFX s ах овою .
SFX s ці і .
SFX s но лась .
SFX s ової ами .
SFX s ом них .
SFX s ннями тимете .
SFX s еві а .
SFX s ую овану .
SFX s овані увало .
SFX s ннях ться .
SFX s или ять .
SFX s ко ському .
SFX s ки ми .
SFX s ових а .
SFX s цями ку .
SFX s імо уть .
SFX s льні тимеш .
SFX s ішої ості .
SFX s іших ому .
SFX s ючої єте .
SFX s ок ській .
SFX s ської і .
SFX s іші ою .
SFX s чих 0 .
SFX s ючі ватимеш .
SFX s стями го .
SFX s ських кам .
SFX s ити імо .
SFX s ські ку .
SFX s имо у .
SFX s цею ка .
SFX s ені имо .
SFX s цю ському .
SFX s єю йний .
SFX s цях ськими .
SFX s імося имось .
SFX s ули ете .
SFX s цям ськім .
SFX s ця ський .
SFX s імся илось .
SFX s иш іться .
SFX s имося імся .
SFX s тві ькою .
SFX s ути еш .
SFX s цем ські .
SFX s етеся імось .
SFX s стях 0 .
SFX s ії и .
SFX s итеся імо .
SFX s ацію ованим .
SFX s имся еною .
SFX s ишся еній .
SFX s аю уванням .
SFX s юю ені .
SFX s остям ішими .
SFX s ація увати .
SFX s чем льнім .
SFX s чні ка .
SFX s ч тись .
SFX s ювані ять .
SFX s ство ці .
SFX s іли им .
SFX s увані аній .
SFX s ині ів .
SFX s тої ли .
SFX s ьмо ило .
SFX s тих лося .
SFX s іти ять .
SFX s ьої ім .
SFX s яли еними .
SFX s немо атимеш .
SFX s яти юватиму .
SFX s нем али .
SFX s лю илось .
SFX s змі сти .
SFX s вачі ємося .
SFX s ник ці .
SFX s аціями уватиме .
SFX s ни ать .
SFX s неш ать .
SFX s цької ком .
SFX s аціях увати .
SFX s аціям увать .
SFX s яю ена .
SFX s аційні уватиме .
SFX s цьких ка .
SFX s торі ційнім .
SFX s то всь .
SFX s ичі ій .
SFX s лі ю .
SFX s зм стські .
SFX s лої ть .
SFX s тори ційне .
SFX s цтво ками .
SFX s ячи ити .
SFX s ьмося итесь .
SFX s лих йте .
SFX s ьтеся ились .
SFX s івні овому .
SFX s инями ам .
SFX s цькі м .
SFX s инею у .
SFX s атор ованім .
SFX s ливої ними .
SFX s подібні вої .
SFX s евої ів .
SFX s иню ічний .
SFX s инях ічним .
SFX s иням ічної .
SFX s ливих ній .
SFX s ливі ною .
SFX s ин овою .
SFX s тали чімо .
SFX s уті імо .
SFX s исті е .
SFX s уваті овими .
SFX s чемо тать .
SFX s тати чім .
SFX s енької ими .
SFX s тивні ційному .
SFX s сі ні .
SFX s немося авшися .
SFX s чик ного .
SFX s еньких ої .
SFX s іш ицях .
SFX s євої ї .
SFX s нешся аємось .
SFX s немся аєтеся .
SFX s енькі ішими .
SFX s евих я .
SFX s овні увались .
SFX s істі и .
SFX s ови е .
SFX s ері ів .
SFX s іст 0 .
SFX s зі гом .
SFX s єві йовичем .
SFX s яні юванням .
SFX s ери ували .
SFX s шали й .
SFX s євих йовичем .
SFX s шати ємо .
SFX s чеш тіти .
SFX s торні ційний .
SFX s ливо у .
SFX s ая іший .
SFX s оти ають .
SFX s їли єними .
SFX s кали чу .
SFX s ївні євому .
SFX s тя ись .
SFX s ачи ило .
SFX s ер увалася .
SFX s тті вавши .
SFX s оді ідними .
SFX s ттю вайтесь .
SFX s юк ових .
SFX s щі ську .
SFX s ттям ваймось .
SFX s їмо єній .
SFX s їти єнім .
SFX s ист ів .
SFX s чук ко .
SFX s арі овій .
SFX s арями у .
SFX s їм ювать .
SFX s ологію и .
SFX s ищем ою .
SFX s їш ював .
SFX s єні їте .
SFX s кати немо .
SFX s дали вши .
SFX s кли чімо .
SFX s іні ине .
SFX s арю ових .
SFX s ат уєм .
SFX s си в .
SFX s зали жемо .
SFX s арем ових .
SFX s жемо зать .
SFX s дати в .
SFX s арях ове .
SFX s арям ова .
SFX s оні ів .
SFX s зати жу .
SFX s чати ки .
SFX s як ову .
SFX s ди м .
SFX s часті ка .
SFX s иті ом .
SFX s демо в .
SFX s ги ку .
SFX s оті ів .
SFX s уні ах .
SFX s тні ю .
SFX s ухи и .
SFX s оли и .
SFX s жні 0 .
SFX s ети і .

SFX t Y 1
SFX t 0 і .

SFX u Y 1
SFX u 0 ові .

SFX v Y 1
SFX v 0 а .

SFX w Y 1
SFX w 0 ться .

SFX x Y 182
SFX x у о .
SFX x і ями .
SFX x йте ємо .
SFX x єте ймо .
SFX x ете у .
SFX x ться лася .
SFX x осте істю .
SFX x ю сте .
SFX x а ості .
SFX x го сті .
SFX x и ось .
SFX x ло ться .
SFX x ь иму .
SFX x ємо вали .
SFX x ймо вали .
SFX x й вало .
SFX x вшися ти .
SFX x емо уться .
SFX x мося сь .
SFX x тися в .
SFX x лися тимуся .
SFX x лося тимуся .
SFX x в тимемся .
SFX x єм ватиме .
SFX x лася тимемо .
SFX x йтеся вавшися .
SFX x тимешся лось .
SFX x имуся ься .
SFX x вся тимеш .
SFX x емся у .
SFX x тиме вшися .
SFX x єтеся ють .
SFX x ємся валася .
SFX x єш юся .
SFX x йся ватися .
SFX x єшся ймо .
SFX x юся валися .
SFX x мем ся .
SFX x тимеш лась .
SFX x є ватися .
SFX x нням ться .
SFX x ючися вавшись .
SFX x ння всь .
SFX x ним вши .
SFX x нім вши .
SFX x ї ям .
SFX x не у .
SFX x них ться .
SFX x ам ним .
SFX x ах не .
SFX x овим у .
SFX x но лася .
SFX x овім ами .
SFX x ом не .
SFX x ннях тимемся .
SFX x ите іть .
SFX x ових 0 .
SFX x ове і .
SFX x ко ським .
SFX x ським ці .
SFX x ськім ці .
SFX x імо е .
SFX x шім стю .
SFX x шим стю .
SFX x ючим ємо .
SFX x ючім ємо .
SFX x ок ської .
SFX x ше м .
SFX x ших й .
SFX x чих ться .
SFX x юче ватимем .
SFX x ське ко .
SFX x ських ках .
SFX x имо яться .
SFX x ице ого .
SFX x цях ськім .
SFX x цям ським .
SFX x ця й .
SFX x імся илося .
SFX x иш ю .
SFX x етеся імося .
SFX x цем ське .
SFX x итеся еній .
SFX x имся ений .
SFX x ишся енім .
SFX x остях ішими .
SFX x остям ішого .
SFX x ація увать .
SFX x чем льний .
SFX x ч тися .
SFX x тім вши .
SFX x тим ли .
SFX x ьте ять .
SFX x ьмо ити .
SFX x ство ками .
SFX x тих лись .
SFX x цькім ками .
SFX x цьким ками .
SFX x нем ати .
SFX x зме сте .
SFX x лим вши .
SFX x ник кам .
SFX x лім вши .
SFX x неш аєм .
SFX x аціях увать .
SFX x ціям торові .
SFX x торе ційнім .
SFX x цьких ки .
SFX x зм стська .
SFX x увате ами .
SFX x евим і .
SFX x цьке к .
SFX x цтво кові .
SFX x то 0 .
SFX x лих ймо .
SFX x ле єм .
SFX x евім і .
SFX x ьтеся илися .
SFX x атор ований .
SFX x жуся ились .
SFX x исте у .
SFX x ливім нім .
SFX x ливим нім .
SFX x уте ете .
SFX x инях ічних .
SFX x иням ічною .
SFX x ячися ились .
SFX x ливе ної .
SFX x ливих них .
SFX x ин ової .
SFX x євим ю .
SFX x енькім ому .
SFX x еньким ому .
SFX x чуся тилась .
SFX x євім ю .
SFX x чик ному .
SFX x істе ові .
SFX x еньке ий .
SFX x еньких их .
SFX x нися алися .
SFX x нешся аємося .
SFX x нуся аєтеся .
SFX x ніш 0 .
SFX x ере ів .
SFX x ливіш нішими .
SFX x ст зувавши .
SFX x іте у .
SFX x еве а .
SFX x щуся ститись .
SFX x зе тичною .
SFX x євих ям .
SFX x евих у .
SFX x єве ях .
SFX x ая іших .
SFX x чеш тім .
SFX x шуся ситесь .
SFX x ливо ність .
SFX x сим шеними .
SFX x їте юватиме .
SFX x тя ися .
SFX x ер увались .
SFX x ще ськом .
SFX x юк ового .
SFX x ттям ваймося .
SFX x їмо єнім .
SFX x чук овими .
SFX x їм єно .
SFX x ищем ові .
SFX x їш юймо .
SFX x дім сти .
SFX x ат уєш .
SFX x арем ової .
SFX x івим овим .
SFX x же зі .
SFX x де не .
SFX x часте кам .
SFX x арях ова .
SFX x арям ову .
SFX x ячим і .
SFX x як о .
SFX x ячім і .
SFX x учим и .

SFX y Y 1
SFX y 0 ом .

SFX z Y 1
SFX z 0 ами .
